Hawaii, session 2026, GM1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the stadium
development district was established in 2019 within the Hawaii
community development authority. Subsequently, in 2022, the
legislature created a transit-oriented development
infrastructure improvement program within the Hawaii community
development authority. In establishing this program, the
legislature found that the "construction, installation, and
improvement of certain infrastructure is necessary and desirable
to facilitate renewal and redevelopment of areas designated by
the State and the counties for transit-oriented development".
The legislature further finds that one area designated by
the city and county of Honolulu for transit-oriented development
is the Halawa area transit-oriented development neighborhood,
which surrounds the Halawa/Aloha Stadium rail station. The
State, through the stadium authority and department of
accounting and general services, is currently working with a
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 1
liiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiHi

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
developer to construct a new Aloha Stadium in this transit-
oriented development neighborhood.
The legislature also finds that it is in the best interests
of the State to redesignate the stadium development district as
the Halawa community development district and to establish the
Hawaii community development authority as the zoning and
entitlement agency for the district, given the State's interest
in developing both:
(1) The new Aloha Stadium, including the land surrounding
the new stadium; and
(2) Infrastructure within the Halawa transit-oriented
development neighborhood surrounding the Halawa/Aloha
Stadium rail station.
The legislature additionally finds that it would be in the
best interests of the State for the Hawaii community development
authority's zoning and entitlement powers to supersede the
zoning and entitlement powers of the city and county of Honolulu
for the area constituting the district upon the adoption of
necessary plans and rules by the Hawaii community development
authority.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Through the normal process of overseeing the Halawa
community development district, the Hawaii community development
authority may assess and impose regulatory and service fees and
assessments upon beneficiaries of the district, including permit
review fees and other fees necessary to cover the Hawaii
community development authority's costs of maintaining,
regulating, and providing services to beneficiaries of and for
the district. As the Hawaii community development authority's
responsibilities and obligations for the district would be
ongoing, and the costs to maintain, regulate, and provide
services may vary from year to year, the general fund
appropriation process may not be sufficient to successfully
implement the goals of the district. Accordingly, the
legislature finds that the establishment of a special fund that
satisfies the requirements of section 37-52.3, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, is appropriate and necessary to ensure that the
district is appropriately developed and maintained.
Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to:
(1) Redesignate the stadium development district as the
Halawa community development district;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiiiiiiiHigiiiiiuiiiiniiiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(2) Amend the respective responsibilities of the stadium
authority and Hawaii community development authority;
(3) Clarify the Hawaii community development authority's
consultation and permitting powers with respect to
public projects within community development
districts;
(4) Establish the Halawa community development district
special fund; and
(5) Establish requirements for the comptroller to verify
that invoices for the capital costs of the Halawa
community development district comply with applicable
law and the purposes for which public funds were
appropriated, allocated, transferred, deposited, or
otherwise made available.
SECTION 2. Chapter 206E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to part IX to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§206E- Halawa community development district special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the
Halawa community development district special fund.
Notwithstanding section 206E-16 or any other law to the
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx
ilMMIlUilllllllllimill

Page 5 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
contrary, the following shall be deposited into the special
fund;
(1) All revenues, income, and receipts of the authority
derived from activities within and outside the
district, except for revenues designated for deposit
into the stadium development special fund in
section 109-3.5;
(2) Moneys directed, allocated, or disbursed to the
district from government agencies or private
individuals or organizations, including grants, gifts,
awards, donations, and assessments of landowners for
costs to administer and operate the district; and
(3) Appropriations made by the legislature to the fund.
(b) Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the purposes
of this part.
(c) Investment earnings credited to the assets of the fund
shall become part of the fund.
§206E- Halawa community development district;
certification statement. (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, and until
the completion of the project, the comptroller, upon the request
for payment by the stadium authority, Hawaii community
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 5
liimiiiiiiuiiiniiHiiiiiur

Page 6 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
development authority, or any other designated project entity,
shall verify that invoices for the capital costs of the Halawa
community development district, including the new aloha stadium
entertainment district project and related district
infrastructure and public facilities, comply with applicable law
and the purposes for which public funds were appropriated,
allocated, transferred, deposited, or otherwise made available.
(b) The stadium authority, Hawaii community development
authority, or other designated project entity subject to this
section shall provide the comptroller with:
(1) The project financial plan and related systems for
accounting, including a budget for the project;
(2) Expenditures for capital costs for the project;
(3) Expenditures for personnel costs, lease rent, and any
other costs associated with the entity's management
and operations; and
(4) Any other information the comptroller may require to
accomplish the purpose of this section.
(c) After the comptroller verifies that the submitted
invoices for capital costs of the project are an acceptable use
of funds, the comptroller shall submit a certification
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx
IIUIHIIIIHMIimillllllli

Page 7
S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
statement, including any appropriate supporting documents, to
the appropriate state entity for the allocation, release, or
payment of funds, if available. The certification statement
shall include, at a minimum, the total amount contained in the
invoices for capital costs that are verified as an appropriate
use of funds.
(d) The comptroller may adopt rules, exempt from chapter
91, for the purposes of this section.
(e) For the purposes of this section, "designated project
entity" means the stadium authority, Hawaii community
development authority, or any other public entity designated by
law, interagency agreement, or contract to administer, manage,
construct, operate, maintain, or finance the Halawa community
development district, including the new aloha stadium
entertainment district project and related district
infrastructure and public facilities."
SECTION 3. Section 109-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) There shall be within the department of business,
economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes
only, a stadium authority whose responsibility shall be to
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx
nniiiiiiiiviiiiiiiiain

Page 8
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
maintain, operate, and manage the stadium [development
diatrict.-], facilities attached to the stadium, and real
property held by the stadium authority, including facilitating
the planning, design, development, and construction of a new
stadium and the area surrounding the new stadium, consistent
with the memorandum of agreement pursuant to section 206E-225.
The authority shall consist of eleven members. Eight members
shall be appointed by the governor in the manner prescribed by
section 26-34.
Of the eight public members:
(1) One member shall be designated as the Aiea community
representative and be a resident of one of the
following areas:
(A) Excluding Ford Island, the area beginning at the
intersection of the shoreline and Admiral Clarey
(Ford Island) Bridge and running:
(i) Easterly along said bridge to Salt Lake
boulevard;
(ii) Southeasterly along said boulevard to
Luapele drive;
(iii) Westerly along said drive to Fleet place;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx
iiniBiiiMiiiiHniBiMiniiHi

Page 9 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(iv) Westerly along said place to Ulithi street;
(V) Southwesterly along said street to Luapele
road;
(vi) Westerly along said road to Ulihi road;
(vii) Westerly along said road to Makalapa drive;
(viii) Southwesterly along said drive to Halawa
drive;
(ix) Northwesterly along said drive to Kamehameha
highway;
(X) Northerly along said highway to Halawa
stream;
(Xi) Westerly along said stream to the shoreline;
and
(xii) Northerly along said shoreline to its
intersection with Admiral Clarey (Ford
Island) Bridge;
(B) The area beginning at the intersection of Kaonohi
street and H-1 freeway and running:
(i) Southeasterly along said freeway to the
Moanalua freeway - Kamehameha highway
connector;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx
HiiiiiHiiiiiiiiiinnnMii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(ii) Northwesterly along said highway connector
to Kamehameha highway;
(iii) Northwesterly along said highway to Aiea
stream;
(iv) Southerly along said stream to the
shoreline;
(v) Northwesterly along said shoreline to
Kalauao stream;
(vi) Northeasterly along said stream to
Kamehameha highway;
(vii) Northwesterly along said highway to Kaonohi
street; and
(viii) Northeasterly along said street to its
intersection with H-1 freeway; or
(C) The area beginning at the intersection of Waimalu
stream and Koolau ridge and running:
(i) Southeasterly along said ridge to
Ewa-Honolulu district boundary;
(ii) Southwesterly along said boundary to Red
Hill Naval Reservation boundary;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 10

S.B. NO.
s"
C.D. 1
(iii) Southwesterly along said boundary to Tampa
drive;
(iv) Westerly along said drive to the unnamed
road;
(v) Northerly along said road to Icarus way;
(vi) Westerly along said way to the unnamed road;
(vii) Southwesterly along said road to Moanalua
freeway {H-201);
(viii) Westerly along said freeway to H-1 freeway;
(ix) Northwesterly along said freeway to Kaonohi
street;
(x) Southwesterly along said street to Moanalua
road;
(xi) Westerly along said road to Kaahumanu
street;
(xii) Northerly along said street to Komo Mai
drive;
(xiii) Easterly along said drive to Punanani gulch;
(xiv) Northeasterly along said gulch to the
powerline;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 11
iiiiiimiiiiiiMiiiiiiiniiiiniin

Page 12 S.B. NO.
“^2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(xv) Southeasterly along said powerline to
Waimalu stream;
(xvi) Northeasterly along said stream to Aiea
stream;
(xvii) Easterly along said stream to Waimalu
stream; and
(xviii) Southeasterly along said stream to its
intersection with Koolau ridge; and
(2) One member shall be designated as the west Honolulu
community representative and be a resident of the area
beginning at the intersection of H-1 freeway and
Moanalua freeway {H-201) and running:
(A) Southeasterly along said freeway to Aliamanu
Military Reservation southern boundary;
(B) Westerly along said boundary to Wanaka street;
(C) Southwesterly along said street to Likini street;
(D) Northwesterly along said street to Ukana street;
(E) Southwesterly along said street to Keaka drive;
(F) Northwesterly along said drive to Manuwa drive;
(G) Southeasterly along said drive to Pakini street;
(H) Southwesterly along said street to Keaka drive;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx
'UllUillllHIIIIIffliHlilllil

Page 13
S.B. NO. sTa
CD. 1
(I) Southerly along said drive to Puolo drive;
(J) Westerly along said drive to Likini street;
(K) Southerly along said street to Maluna street;
(L) Westerly along said street to Salt Lake
boulevard;
(M) Southeasterly along said boulevard to the former
street entrance to U.S. Naval Reservation;
(N) Southwesterly along said feature to Reeves loop;
(0) Southwesterly along said loop to Radford drive;
(P) Westerly along said drive to H-1 freeway; and
(Q) Northerly along said freeway to its intersection
with Moanalua freeway (H-201).
Each public member of the authority shall have been a citizen of
the United States and a resident of the State for at least five
years next preceding the member's appointment. The remaining
three members shall include the director of business, economic
development, and tourism or the director's designee, who shall
be an ex officio voting member, and the president of the
[Univ-oroity] university of Hawaii and superintendent of
education, or their designees, who shall be ex officio nonvoting
members of the authority."
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 13
iigiiiiiMiiiiiiiiniiiM

Page 14 S.B. NO. S?*
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Section 109-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§109-2 Stadiijm authority; powers and duties. The powers
and duties of the stadium authority shall be as follows:
(1) To repair, maintain, and operate the stadium and
related facilities [and' the stadium dovolopment
district], including:
(A) Repairs, maintenance, operations, and demolition
of existing stadium facilities;
{B) [and—maiftteftaftee] Repairs,
maintenance, and operations of a new stadium[-^]
and related facilities; and
(C) Contractual payments to developers, contractors,
or management contractors engaged by the stadium
authority;
(2) To coordinate in planning, design, and construction
activities, including on-site repairs, within [dhe
stadium development district;] real property held by
the stadium authority;
(3) To acquire and hold title to real property;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 14
IIIIHilllllllllllllllMIHII

PaQS 15 O n KI 2599
b.D. NO.
S.D.2
C.D. 1
(4) To prescribe and collect rents, fees, and charges for
the use or enjoyment of the stadium, facilities
related to the stadium, and real property held by the
stadium authority, including entering into leases,
contracts, sponsorship and advertising agreements,
food and beverage agreements, concession agreements,
parking agreements, or other development and use
agreements that may apply; provided that leases shall
not exceed a term of ninety-nine years;
(5) To make and execute contracts and other instruments
necessary or convenient to exercise its powers under
this chapter and subject to any limitations in this
chapter, to exercise all powers necessary, incidental,
or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes
and provisions of this chapter;
(6) To adopt, amend, and repeal, in accordance with
chapter 91, rules it may deem necessary to effectuate
this chapter and in connection with its projects,
operations, and facilities;
(7) To appoint officers, agents, and employees, prescribe
their duties and qualifications, and fix their
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx ]
iiiniiimiHMiiiininiiiiiiiii

Page 16 2599
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
salaries, without regard to chapters 76 and 89, to
manage the stadium [-7—the otad-ium dovolopmont
diotricty] and related facilities, real property held
by the stadium authority, and its contractors; [aftd]
(8) To plan, promote, and market the stadium and related
facilities[—]£
(9) To be the sole agency responsible for overseeing and
facilitating the planning, design, development, and
construction of the:
(A) New stadium and related facilities; and
Area surrounding the new stadium; and
(10) To engage and retain experts and consultants on a
contractual basis as may be necessary or convenient
for the execution of its powers and duties.
SECTION 5. Section 109-3.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
[-F] §109-3,5 [^] Stadium development special fund;
established. There is established in the state treasury
the stadium development special fund, into which funds collected
by the stadium authority shall be deposited, including:
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 16
IIIIHIIIIIIIHMIIIIIUIIII

Page 17
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) All revenues from [the otadium development district, ]
real£ro£ert^y 2ield by the st^dium autliori^t^^ including
but not limited to agreements or actions generating
revenue related to stadium operations, lease or rental
of facilities or land, concessions, food and beverage,
parking, sponsorship and advertising, utilities and
infrastructure, and development;
(2) All gifts or grants awarded in any form from any
public agency or any other source for purposes of the
stadium [development district;] authority;
(3) All proceeds from revenue bonds issued for the purpose
of the stadium [development distr-ict;] authority; and
(4) Appropriations made by the legislature to the fund.
(b) Moneys in the stadium development special fund shall
be used by the stadium authority for the payment of expenses
arising from any and all use, operation, repair, maintenance,
alteration, improvement, development, or any unforeseen or
unplanned repairs of the [stadium -development district,] real
property and improvements thereon held by the stadium authority,
including without limitation:
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 17
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiwniiiinin

Page 18 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(1) The development, operation, repair, and maintenance of
a new stadium;
(2) Food and beverage service and parking service provided
at the stadium facility; the sale of souvenirs, logo
items, or other items; any future major repair,
maintenance, and improvement of the stadium facility
as a commercial enterprise or as a world-class
facility for athletic events, entertainment, or public
events; and marketing the facility pursuant to
section 109-2(4) and (8); and
(3) Contractual payments to developers or contractors
engaged by the stadium authority for the purpose of
redeveloping the site and related on- and off-site
infrastructure that benefits the [otO'dium district and
its dovolopmcnt guidance policies.] real property held
by the stadium authority."
SECTION 6. Section 206E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The authority shall consist of the director of
finance or the director's designee; the director of
transportation or the director's designee; the director of
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx

iiiiEiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiimi

Page 19 S.B. NO. sTz
C.D. 1
business, economic development, and tourism or the director's
designee; the chairperson of’the board of land and natural
resources; the director of planning or planning and permitting
of each county in which a community development district is
located or the director's designee; a cultural specialist; an
at-large member nominated by the president of the senate; an
at-large member nominated by the speaker of the house of
representatives; two representatives of the Heeia community
development district, comprising one resident of that district
or the Koolaupoko district, which consists of sections 1 through
9 of zone 4 of the first tax map key division, and one owner of
a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit
organization in the Heeia community development district or
Koolaupoko district; two representatives of the Kalaeloa
community development district, comprising one resident of the
Ewa zone (zone 9, sections 1 through 2) or the Waianae zone
(zone 8, sections 1 through 9) of the first tax map key
division, and one owner of a small business or one officer or
director of a nonprofit organization in the Ewa or Waianae zone;
two representatives of the Kakaako community development
district, comprising one resident of the district and one owner
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 19
liiiHigiHEiiiiiiiniiiiii

Page 20 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
of a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit
organization in the district; two representatives of the
Pulehunui community development district, consisting of one
resident of the island of Maui, and one owner of a small
business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization
on the island of Maui; two representatives of the Halawa
community development district, consisting of one resident of
the district, and one owner of a small business or officer or
director of a nonprofit organization selected from the areas
represented by the following Oahu tax map key numbers, as
currently defined and as may be amended by the city and county
of Honolulu real property assessment division: 1-1-010 to 1-1-
011, 1-1-023 to 1-1-024, 9-8-001 to 9-8-002, 9-8-008, 9-8-011 to
9-8-019, 9-8-025 to 9-8-046, 9-8-053 to 9-8-054, 9-8-056 to 9-8-
IS 058, 9-8-60 to 9-8-073, 9-9-002 to 9-9-012, and 9-9-014 to 9-9-
078; and, for the purposes of part X of this chapter only, two
experts on transit-oriented development, to be appointed one
each by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives; and the following ex officio, nonvoting
members: the chairpersons of the respective senate and house of
representatives standing committees having jurisdiction over
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 20
iiiwiiiiininiiiiiiiiiii

Page 21
S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
transportation, and the chairpersons of the respective senate
and house of representatives standing committees having
jurisdiction over housing.
All members except the director of finance; director of
transportation; county directors of planning or planning and
permitting; director of business, economic development, and
tourism; chairperson of the board of land and natural resources;
the two experts on transit-oriented development appointed by the
president of the senate and speaker of the house of
representatives, respectively; the chairpersons of the
respective senate and house of representatives standing
committees having jurisdiction over transportation; the
chairpersons of the respective senate and house of
representatives standing committees having jurisdiction over
housing; or, where relevant, their respective designees shall be
appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34. The two
at-large members nominated by the president of the senate and
speaker of the house of representatives shall each be invited to
serve and appointed by the governor from a list of three
nominees submitted for each position by the nominating authority
specified in this subsection.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 21
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiEiiiiiiiiiEiiniii

Page 22
S.B. NO. S?*
C.D. 1
The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall each submit a list of six nominees for
each district to the governor to fill the two district
representative positions for each community development
district. For each community development district, the governor
shall appoint one member from a list of nominees submitted by
the president of the senate and one member from a list of
nominees submitted by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and of the two appointees, one shall meet the
district residency requirement and one shall meet the district
small business owner or nonprofit organization officer or
director requirement.
The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall each appoint a member having expertise and
IS experience in urban planning and community development to fill
the two positions designated for experts on transit-oriented
development.
The authority shall be organized and shall exercise
jurisdiction as follows:
(1) For matters affecting the Heeia community development
district, the following members shall be considered in
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 2
IIIIIIIIMIIillllHIIIilliHIIIII

Page 23
S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible
to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Heeia community development
district is located or the director's designee;
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at-large members; and
(G) The two representatives of the Heeia community
development district;
(2) For matters affecting the Kalaeloa community
development district, the following members shall be
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx 23

Page 24
S.B. NO. "'2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Kalaeloa community
development district is located or the director's
designee;
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at-large members; and
(G) The two representatives of the Kalaeloa community
development district;
(3) For matters affecting the Kakaako community
development district, the following members shall be
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx
IIIIIIIIHIIIIIiHlllllliMni

Page 25
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Kakaako community development
district is located or the director's designee;
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at-large members; and
(G) The two representatives of the Kakaako community
development district;
(4) For matters affecting the Pulehunui community
development district, the following members shall be
considered in determining quorum and majority and
shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx 25

Page 26
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(D) The director of planning for the county in which
the Pulehunui community development district is
located or the director's designee;
(E) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designee;
(F) The cultural specialist;
(G) The two at-large members; and
(H) The two representatives of the Pulehunui
community development district; [and]
(5) For matters affecting part X of this chapter only, the
following members shall be considered in determining
quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote:
(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designee;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx 26
ininMiiiiniiiiiiiiMiiiiiiii

Page 27
S.B. NO.
s"
CD. 1
(E) The director of planning for the county in which
the program area is located or the director's
designee;
(F) The cultural specialist;
(G) The two at-large members; and
(H) The two experts on transit-oriented development
appointed by the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives[—] 2 and
(6) For matters affecting the Halawa community development
district, the following members shall be considered in
determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible
to vote:
The director of finance or the director's
designee;
(B) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;
(C) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;
(D) The director of planning and permitting for the
county in which the Halawa community development
district is located or the director's designee;
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx 27
IIIIHIlllNESliyiliyi^HlUIIH

Page 28
S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(E) The cultural specialist;
(F) The two at<;lar£e niembers2 ar^
(G) The two representatives of the Halawa community
development district.
[In the event of] If a vacancy]-] occurs, a member shall be
appointed to fill the vacancy in the same manner as the original
appointment within thirty days of the vacancy or within ten days
of the senate's rejection of a previous appointment, as
applicable.
The terms of the director of finance; director of
transportation; county directors of planning and permitting;
director of business, economic development, and tourism; and
chairperson of the board of land and natural resources; or their
respective designees shall run concurrently with each official's
term of office. The terms of the appointed voting members shall
be for four years, commencing on July 1 and expiring on June 30.
The governor shall provide for staggered terms of the initially
appointed voting members so that the initial terms of four
members selected by lot shall be for two years, the initial
terms of four members selected by lot shall be for three years,
and the initial terms of the remaining three members shall be
2026-2568 SB2599 GDI SMA.docx 2
iniiiuniiiiiiiiiMiiiiniiini

Page 29
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
for four years. The terms on the authority of the chairpersons
of the senate and house of representatives standing committees
having jurisdiction over housing and the chairpersons of the
senate and house of representatives standing committees having
jurisdiction over transportation shall run concurrently with
that respective legislator's term as the chairperson of that
respective committee.
The governor may remove or suspend for cause any member
after due notice and public hearing.
Notwithstanding section 92-15, a majority of all eligible
voting members as specified in this subsection shall constitute
a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of
all eligible voting members as specified in this subsection
shall be necessary to make any action of the authority valid.
All members shall continue in office until their respective
successors have been appointed and qualified. Except as
[heroin] provided[7-] in this section, no member appointed under
this subsection shall be an officer or employee of the State or
its political subdivisions.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 29

Page 30
S.B. NO. "'2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
For the purposes of this section, "small business" means a
business that is independently owned and that is not dominant in
its field of operation."
SECTION 7. Section 206E-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [4-1 §206E-13[^-] Public projects. Any project or activity
[e^.] undertaken solely by, or through an independent contractor
on behalf of, any county or agency of the State in a designated
district shall be constructed, renovated, or improved in
consultation with the authority. As part of the consultation
requirement, the authority shall provide its discretionary
recommendation to the county or agency of the State before the
project or activity proceeding; provided that the county or
agency of the State shall not be required to obtain permits from
IS the authority; provided further that any project or activity
undertaken by any county or agency of the State in a designated
district as a joint venture or in partnership with a private
party, or as otherwise provided in rules adopted by the
authority under chapter 91, shall be constructed, renovated, or
improved only after obtaining the necessary permits from the
authority."
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 30
HMiiiinimiiniiiiiiiiiini

Page 31
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 8. Section 206E-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) The authority may, without recourse to public
auction, sell, or lease for a term not exceeding sixty-five
years, all or any portion of the real or personal property
constituting a redevelopment project to any person, upon [-s^eh]
terms and conditions [as—fftey—be] approved by the authority, if
the authority finds that the sale or lease is in conformity with
the community development plan.
For the stadium development district, leases shall not
exceed a term of ninety-nine years."
SECTION 9. Chapter 206E, part IX, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
is amended to read as follows:
"[4] PART IX. [41 HALAWA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
§206E-221 [Stekdiwft] Halawa community development district;
purpose; findings. The legislature finds that the aloha stadium
and lands [under the-^tMf-iodiction of] held by the stadium
authority [eftd], within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism for administrative purposes only, are
underutilized. The stadium facility has been in dire need of
significant repair and maintenance for many years. The stadium
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 3:
iniiBiwiBmiiiiiHiiiii

Page 32 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
authority has considered repairing, upgrading, and replacing the
existing facility to optimize the public's enjoyment and ensure
public safety. Redeveloping, renovating, or improving these
public lands in a manner that will provide suitable
recreational, residential, educational, and commercial areas,
where the public can live, congregate, recreate, attend schools,
and shop, as part of a thoughtfully integrated experience, is in
the best interests of the State and its people.
This part establishes the Halawa community
development district to make optimal use of public land for the
economic, residential, educational, and social benefit of the
people of [Hawaii.] the State.
The legislature finds that the jurisdiction of the
authority shall include development within the [etediuffi] Halawa
community development district. Any development within the
district shall require a permit from the authority.
§206E-222 Definitions. As used in this part, unless the
context otherwise requires:
"Authority" [or "stadium-authority"] means the [edadiufft
authority GOtablishcd pursuant to section 109-1.] Hawaii
community development authority.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx

miHIIHIIIIIIHIilllilH

Page 33
S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
"District" means the [stadium] Halawa community development
district established by this part.
S206E-223 District; established; boundaries. (a) The
[stadium] Halawa community development district is established
and shall be composed of [all real property under the
jurisdiction of the stadium authority established pursuant to
section—109-1.--The stadium authority shall have solo
jurisdiction over the development of the-■stadium- dovcl-epmont
districtr-. ] the following parcels of land, identified by Oahu tax
map key number: 9-9-003:055, 9-9-003:061, 9-9-003:070, and
9-9-003:071.
(b) The authority shall [fecilitate the development of all
property—teeienging-^fee—"the—State—within—the—distrietr^-] prepare a
community development plan pursuant to section 206E-5 and
community development rules pursuant to section 206E-7 to
regulate the development of all property belonging to the State
within the district; provided that development [is carried out
in accordance with] plans shall consider any county
transit-oriented development plans for lands surrounding the
district. In addition to any other duties that the authority
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 33
iiiMiiiii'itiiiiieHiiiiNiiiiniuii

Page 34
S.B. NO. sTa
C.D. 1
may have pursuant to this chapter, the authority's duties shall
include [-*-
4-14- Coordinating wi-^h—feho -gedoral -government regarding the
ownership and uoc of,—or restrictions-on,—properties
within the district that were previously owned or arc
currcfttly owned by the federal gov-ej?niften-fe-/-
4-2-)- Coordinating with other sta^jo-entiti-cs- during-t-hc
conveyanceof propertiesandconducting remediation
acti-v-ltico--for ■ the property belonging to the ■State
within-the district;
-1S4- Developing] developing the infrastructure and public
facilities necessary to support the development of all
property belonging to the State within the district [-^

LI 1
4-44- Providing,—to-bhe extent feasible,—maximum opportunity
for the rouse of property-belonging to the State
within the district by private ontcrpeioc or state and
county government.], consistent with the memorandum of
agreement pursuant to section 206E-225.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 34
HVilinniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 35
S.B. NO. S?*
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
§206E-224 Development guidance policies. The following
shall be the development guidance policies generally governing
the authority's actions in the district:
(1) Development shall be in accordance with [etedium
S development diotrict] community development plans
adopted [by the stadium authority] under sectlon
206E-5 and community development rules adopted under
section 206E-7 for the development of the district;
provided that the plan [or plans] shall consider any
county development plan and other plans developed for
the district and shall allow for public input in the
plan's preparation and updates;
(2) The authority, upon the concurrence of a majority of
its voting members, may modify and make changes to a
transit-oriented development plan with respect to the
district to respond to changing conditions; provided
that before amending a transit-oriented development
plan, the authority shall conduct a public hearing to
inform the public of the proposed changes and receive
public input;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 35
niiiniiMHiMiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 36
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) The authority shall seek to promote economic
development and employment opportunities by fostering
diverse land uses and encouraging private sector
investments that use the opportunities presented by
the high-capacity transit corridor project consistent
with the needs of the public, including mixed-use
housing and housing in transit-oriented developments;
(4) The authority may engage in planning, design, and
construction activities within and outside the
district; provided that activities outside the
district shall relate to infrastructure development,
area-wide drainage improvements, roadway realignments
and improvements, business and industrial relocation,
and other activities the authority deems necessary to
carry out development of the district and implement
this part. The authority may undertake studies or
coordinate activities in conjunction with the county
and appropriate state agencies and may address
facility systems, industrial relocation, and other
activities;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 36

Page 37
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Archaeological, historic, and cultural sites shall be
preserved and protected in accordance with chapter 6E;
(6) Endangered species of flora and fauna shall be
preserved to the extent required by law;
(7) Land use and development activities within the
district shall be coordinated with and, to the extent
possible, complement existing county and state
policies, plans, and programs affecting the district;
[and-]
(8) Public facilities within the district shall be
planned, located, and developed to support the
development policies established by this chapter for
the district and rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter [-r]; and
(9) Development shall consider the cultural, social,
ecological, and environmental impacts of climate
change and sea level rise to inform holistically
resilient development in the design and siting of
buildings and infrastructure.
§206E-225 [frfeadiusa] Halawa community development district
governance; memorandum of agreement. CWotwithsrfennding aoctiono
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 37
iiiiiioHiiiraimM

Page 38
S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
506E-3 and 206E-4.1,—the-otadium-authority cotabl-iohGd purouanfe
to ocotion 109-1 ohall have oolo-jurisdiotion regarding-mattor&
affecting the otadium development diotrict; provided that the
Hawaii community development] The authority; department of
business, economic development, and tourism; and stadium
authority shall enter into a memorandum of agreement regarding
the implementation of responsibilities of the respective
agencies[—]; provided that the memorandum of agreement shall
specify that the:
(1) Authority's role is limited to:
(A) Regulating land use within the district through
its zoning and entitlement powers; and
(B) Financing, planning, designing, and building
infrastructure and public facilities for the
district; and
(2) Stadium authority is the sole agency responsible for
overseeing and facilitating the planning, design,
development, and construction of the;
(A) New stadium and related facilities; and
(B) Area surrounding the new stadium.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 38
iliHiiiniiiiiiiniimiiiiiniii

Page 39
S.B. NO. S’*
C.D. 1
[-{•] §2O6E-226 [^] Annual conprehensxve report. [Mot] No
less than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature, the authority shall submit to the
legislature an annual comprehensive status report on the
progress of development within the [stadium] Halawa community
development district."
SECTION 10. Sections 171-2, 201H-191.5(d) (3) , and
206E-21.5(a) (1), Hawaii Revised Statutes, are amended by
substituting the words "Halawa community development district"
wherever the words "stadium development district" appear, as the
context requires.
PART II
SECTION 11. The legislature finds that the Halawa
community development district comprises approximately
ninety-eight acres of state public land. The redevelopment of
this district involves not only the replacement of the stadium
facility but also the long-term disposition and transformation
of public lands into a mixed-use, transit-oriented community.
The legislature further finds that the Hawaii community
development authority is the State's designated redevelopment
agency, established to join the strengths of private enterprise
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 39
MIHMIiniilllllMlill

Page 40
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and public regulation. While the stadium authority holds title
to the district, the Hawaii community development authority is
mandated to facilitate the development of the district.
The legislature further finds that development guidance
policies mandate the promotion of economic development through
"mixed-use housing and housing in transit-oriented
developments[,]" and that district plans "shall consider any
county development plan".
The legislature recognizes that the district master
development agreement and shared infrastructure agreement,
whether pending or executed, will govern the district, utility
dedications, and the alienation of state lands for up to
ninety-nine years. To ensure the integrity of the State's
public land assets, the legislature declares that the Hawaii
community development authority must be legally integrated into
these agreements to ensure adherence to the statutory mandates
for mixed-use housing and transit-oriented development.
Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to condition the
increase of the expenditure ceiling for the stadium development
special fund upon compliance with state planning, land use, and
financing statutes.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx
niiimnimiiiHioHi

Page 41
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
SECTION 12. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, no moneys appropriated under this part shall be
allotted, encumbered, or expended until:
(1) The stadium authority submits a district land use and
project readiness report pursuant to subsection (b);
(2) The Hawaii community development authority submits a
definitive community facilities district plan pursuant
to subsection (c); and
(3) The legislature formally accepts both.
(b) The stadium authority shall submit a project readiness
report to the president of the senate and speaker of the house
of representatives that includes the following:
(1) An executed contract verifying that the stadium
authority has exercised its powers under section
109-2(7), Hawaii Revised Statutes, to retain an
independent qualified stadium construction expert with
proven stadium construction experience, not
procurement and design consultants; and
(2) A finalized organizational chart and operational
matrix, complete with functional descriptions,
identifying a clear chain of command and division of
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 4
■iiiiinniimiiniiiliiii

Page 42 O D K. I ^599
O.B. NO.
S.D.2
C.D. 1
responsibilities for the project. To be accepted, the
organizational chart shall establish that:
(A) The Hawaii community development authority serves
as the lead agency for the Halawa community
development district, using its statutory powers
under chapter 206E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to
exclusively manage, finance, and execute all
district infrastructure and public facilities,
rather than serving in an advisory capacity;
(B) The stadium authority serves as the lead agency
for the stadium facility and co-leads district
infrastructure with the Hawaii community
development authority;
(C) The department of accounting and general
services' special projects branch provides
procurement management and independent technical
contract oversight over all contractor and
consultant contracts; and
(D) The independent qualified stadium construction
expert with proven experience, retained under
paragraph (1), is integrated into the finalized
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx
iiiimiiiiMBniiiiginiiMiMii

Page 43 S.B. NO. S’i
C.D. 1
organizational chart to serve as the State's
designated owner's representative to oversee the
stadium build, oversee schedules, and manage the
developer's construction performance.
(c) The Hawaii community development authority shall
submit to the president of the senate and speaker of the house
■ of representatives a definitive community facilities district
plan to use the revenue bond authority established by Act 252,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, including drafts of any memorandum
of agreement with the city and county of Honolulu. This plan
shall detail:
(A) The administration of community facilities
districts under section 46-80.1, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, including the methodology for the levy
and collection of special taxes or user fees to
secure the bonds; and
(B) The specific engineering standards required for
the dedication of district roadways, drainage,
and sewer infrastructure to the city and county
of Honolulu, ensuring compliance with the
Honolulu complete streets design manual.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 43
IIHMMIIIIIIHIIIIHIIII

Page 44
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 13. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $728, 927 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
establishment of three full time equivalent (3.0 FTE) positions
in the department of accounting and general services, including
one permanent special project executive, one permanent senior
project manager, and one permanent cost management specialist.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 14. There is appropriated out of the stadium
development special fund the sum of $49,500,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
purposes of the stadium development special fund as described in
section 109-3.5, Hawaii revised Statutes.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the stadium
authority for the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 15. The legislature finds that Act 252, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2025 (Act 252) , equipped the Hawaii community
development authority with additional financing tools and
enhanced authority to advance and improve development planning
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 4
loiBiiiiMmiHinHiig

Page 45
S.B. NO. S’*
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
and projects. Act 252 also modernized the authority's
development model to reduce the cost of housing construction and
improve critical community infrastructure, public spaces, and
amenities that support a lower cost of living and a higher
quality of life.
The legislature further finds that the Hawaii community
development authority's traditional development strategy relies
heavily on requiring private developers to finance public
infrastructure through negotiation and compromise. This
approach frequently results in inadequate or substandard public
improvements that diminish community quality of life. It also
increases housing costs and reduces the availability of
affordable housing units. By contrast, modern development
strategies used elsewhere shift much of the responsibility for
financing public infrastructure away from developers and toward
a mix of innovative revenue sources. These approaches enable
the creation of complete communities with stronger public
infrastructure and amenities, while lowering housing and overall
living costs for residents.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 45
IIIIIIIBIIillllitlfflilMliWIIII

Page 46
S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
The purpose of this part is to provide statutory updates to
provide development guidance to the Hawaii community development
authority to fully modernize its development strategy.
SECTION 16. Chapter 206E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:'
"§206E- Development policy guidelines for planning of
community development districts. In addition to any other
development guidance policies existing in this chapter, whenever
the authority determines to undertake, or causes to be
undertaken, planning and development to include housing in a
district or community, the authority shall endeavor to plan for
complete communities that include, to the maximum extent
appropriate:
(1) Infrastructure for utilities, including sewer, water,
power, and similar needs;
(2) Affordable housing and related infrastructure;
(3) Public and private commercial spaces;
(4) Public spaces of meaningful scale that shall include:
(A) Public parks and gathering spaces;
(B) Public spaces for hosting markets and events;
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 4
liliiiiiiHiiiBiiiiiiiiiini

Page 47
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) Natural areas with open green space and water for
passive relaxation;
(D) Public spaces for active recreation; and
(E) Public spaces for pets and animals;
(5) Facilities for public arts and culture that include:
(A) Public libraries;
(B) Public works of art;
(C) Spaces for public performances and events;
(D) A£ces£ible edu£at2^onal^and jriarratj^ye exhibite on
the history, culture, and people of the area; and
(E) Flexible spaces and infrastructure for seasonal,
rotating, and evolving programming and
engagement;
Public spaces for local economic development and
community empowerment; provided that the primary focus
shall be assisting local residents, entrepreneurs, and
brands, including:
(A) Community-based economic development hubs and
cooperative spaces such as public commercial
kitchens, processing facilities, or similar work
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 47
millllllVIllIBHIIIilll

Page 48 S.B. NO. S?*
h.D. 3
C.D. 1
hubs available to the community and small
businesses;
(B) Cooperative commercial and retail locations
capable of supporting and aggregating products
and services from numerous small businesses;
(C) Spaces for hosting micro-businesses such as food
trucks, market stalls, and similar temporary
business fronts;
(D) Spaces for hosting growing small businesses in
permanent micro or small commercial locations or
rotating pop-up locations; and
(E) Spaces for hosting larger, maturing businesses in
regular food, retail, and commercial locations;
(7) Commuting infrastructure; provided that the
infrastructure shall be designed to have the capacity
to enable at least seventy per cent of all daily
commutes to, from, and within the area to be safely
and comfortably made by walking, biking, using
micro-mobility devices, or using public transit
between common destinations, as well as for
long-distance daily commuting without interruption.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 48
liiinmiHiwiiuiiiiHEiiiiiiiii

Page 49 2599
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
pursuant to section 264-142 and shall include
amenities such as rest stops, secure bicycle and
micro-mobility device parking, and emergency support
stations with tools and other resources as may be
appropriate;
(8) Public parking hubs of meaningful capacity, including
charging for electric vehicles; provided that;
2^ Twenty-five per cent of all parking stalls
developed shall be electric vehicle-ready;
provided that this subparagraph shall not apply
to the Halawa community development district; and
(B) No minimum parking requirements shall apply to
any development with the district or community,
except for parking stalls reserved for persons
with disabilities as defined in section 291-51;
and
(9) Where practicable, public properties, public
commercial facilities, and other relevant
infrastructure shall be planned with the capacity to
provide meaningful revenue generation from appropriate
facilities, leases, programs, or other means as may be
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 49
iiiiiHiiigiiiiiniiMiinin

Page 50 S.B. NO. STa
C.D. 1
appropriate to help finance the infrastructure
projects identified in this section and fund public
community programs in the area."
PART IV
SECTION 17. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 18. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 19. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2568 SB2599 CDl SMA.docx 50
KHiiiuviiRuuiiiiininini

2599
S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 6th day of July , 2026
W
X
O
Q
Q
Q
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2599, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
211-26

SB No. 2599, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives